Maryland, session 2026, SB0953.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–209.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BASE RENT” MEANS THE RENT IN EFFECT UNDER THE CURRENT
LEASE.
(3) “CONSUMER PRICE INDEX” MEANS THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX
FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA, OR
ANY SUCCESSOR INDEX.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0953*

SENATE BILL 953
(4) “RENT INCREASE LIMIT” MEANS THE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE
AMOUNT THAT A LANDLORD MAY INCREASE THE RENT OF A RENTAL UNIT RELATIVE
TO THE BASE RENT.
(5) “SENIOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AT LEAST 62 YEARS OLD.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN CHARLES COUNTY.
(C) THE COUNTY SHALL ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL RENT INCREASE LIMIT FOR
RENTAL UNITS OCCUPIED BY A SENIOR BASED ON THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.